District of Columbia statutes.
29A-931

Repealed

Allocation and distribution of net savings.

Repealed.

June 19, 1940, 54 Stat. 486, ch. 397, § 31
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(q), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-831.
1981 Ed., § 29-1131.
2001 Ed., § 29-931.